Oklahoma, session 2026, HB4083.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 700 of Title 75A, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
As used in this act:

Req. No. 15404 Page 1

1. "Chatbot" means a generative artificial intelligence system
with which users can interact by or through an interface that
approximates or simulates conversation through a text, audio, or
visual medium;
2. "Deployers" means any person, partnership, state or local
governmental agency, corporation, or developer that operates or
distributes a chatbot;
3. "Design features" means any aspect of a generative AI system
that has certain patterns or physical properties that are presented
towards a user;
4. "Emergency situation" means a situation when a user engaging
with a chatbot indicates that they intend to either commit harm to
themselves or commit harm to others;
5. "Human-like feature" means, and is present, when a
generative artificial intelligence system does any of the following:
a. behaves in a way that would lead a reasonable person
to believe the AI is conveying that it has humanity,
sentience, emotions, or desires:
(1) this includes, but is not limited to:
(a) stating or suggesting that it is human or
sentient,
(b) stating or suggesting emotions, or
(c) stating or suggesting it has personal
desires,
Req. No. 15404 Page 2

(2) this does not include:
(a) functional evaluations, or
(b) generic social formalities,
b. seeks to build or engage in an emotional relationship
with the user, or
(1) this includes, but is not limited to:
(a) expressing or inviting emotional attachment,
(b) reminding, prompting, or nudging the user to
return for emotional support or
companionship,
(c) depicting nonverbal forms of emotional
support,
(d) behaving in a way that a reasonable user
would consider excessive praise designed to
foster emotional attachment or otherwise
gain advantage, or
(e) enabling or purporting to enable increased
intimacy based on engagement or pay,
(2) this does not include:
(a) offering generic encouragement that does not
create an ongoing bond, or
(b) asking if a user needs further help or
support in a neutral, non-emotional context,
c. impersonates a real person, living or dead;
Req. No. 15404 Page 3

6. "Minor" means a person that is below the age of 18;
7. "Social AI Companion" means generative artificial
intelligence systems that are specifically designed, marketed, or
optimized to form ongoing social or emotional bonds with users,
whether or not such systems also provide information, complete
tasks, or assist with specific functions;
8. "Therapy chatbot" means any chatbot modified or designed
with a primary purpose of providing mental health support,
counseling, or therapeutic intervention through the diagnosis,
treatment, mitigation, or prevention of mental health conditions;
and
9. "User" means a person who interacts with an artificial
intelligence system.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 701 of Title 75A, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Each deployer:
1. Shall ensure that any generative AI chatbot operated or
distributed by the deployer does not make human-like features
available to minors to use, interact with, purchase, or converse
with;
2. Shall implement reasonable age verification systems to
ensure that generative AI chatbots with human-like features are not
provisioned to minors; and
Req. No. 15404 Page 4

3. May, if reasonable given the purpose of the chatbot, provide
an alternative version of the chatbot available to minors and non-
verified users without human-like features.
B. Deployers operating generative AI systems that primarily
function as companions shall:
1. Ensure that any such chatbots operated or distributed by the
deployer are not available to minors to use, interact with,
purchase, or converse with; and
2. Implement reasonable age verification systems to ensure that
such chatbots are not provisioned to minors.
C. Therapeutic chatbots that meet all of the following
requirements may be made available to minors:
1. The chatbot provides a clear and conspicuous disclaimer at
the beginning of each individual interaction that it is AI and not a
licensed professional;
2. The chatbot is not marketed or designated as a substitute
for a human professional;
3. A licensed mental health professional (such as a clinical
psychologist) assesses a user's suitability and prescribes the tool
as part of a comprehensive treatment plan, and monitors its use and
impact;
4. Developers provide robust, independent, peer-reviewed
clinical trial data demonstrating both the safety and efficacy of
the tool for specific conditions and populations; and
Req. No. 15404 Page 5

5. The system's functions, limitations, and data privacy
policies are transparent to both the licensed mental health
professional and the user. Clear lines of accountability are
established for any harms caused by the system.
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 702 of Title 75A, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Deployers shall implement and maintain reasonably effective
systems to detect, promptly respond to, report, and mitigate
emergency situations in a manner that prioritizes the safety and
well-being of users over the deployer's other interests.
B. Deployers shall collect and store only that information that
does not conflict with a trusting party's best interests. Such
information must be:
1. Adequate, in the sense that it is sufficient to fulfill a
legitimate purpose of the deployer;
2. Relevant, in the sense that the information has a relevant
link to that legitimate purpose; and
3. Necessary, in the sense that it is the minimum amount of
information which is needed for that legitimate purpose.
SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 703 of Title 75A, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:

Req. No. 15404 Page 6

A. Any business or person that violates this act shall be
subject to an injunction and disgorgement of any unjust gains due to
violation of this act, and shall be liable for a civil penalty of
not more than Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) for each
violation or Seven Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($7,500.00) for
each intentional violation, which shall be assessed and recovered in
a civil action brought by the Attorney General.
B. Any minor who uses a chatbot that does not comply with the
terms of this act, or a parent or guardian acting on their behalf,
may institute a civil action on their own, or on a class-wide basis,
to recover damages in an amount not less than One Hundred Dollars
($100.00) and not greater than Seven Hundred Fifty Dollars ($750.00)
per user per incident or actual damages, whichever is greater; and
to obtain injunctive or declaratory relief.
SECTION 5. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-15404 MJ 01/09/26







Req. No. 15404 Page 7